Washington statutes.
RCW 36.29.160

Segregation and collection of specified assessments and charges made by public utility districts, water-sewer districts, or the county—Fee.

The county treasurer shall make segregation, collect, and receive from any owner or owners of any subdivision or portion of any lot, tract or parcel of land upon which assessments or charges have been made or may be made by public utility districts, water-sewer districts, or the county, under the terms of Title 54 RCW, Title 57 RCW, or chapter 36.88, 36.89, or 36.94 RCW, such portion of the assessments or charges levied or to be levied against such lot, tract or parcel of land in payment of such assessment or charges as the board of commissioners of the public utility district, the water-sewer district commissioners or the board of county commissioners, respectively, shall certify to be chargeable to such subdivision, which certificate shall state that such property as segregated is sufficient security for the assessment or charges. Upon making collection upon any such subdivision the county treasurer shall note such payment upon the records of the office of the treasurer and give receipt therefor. When a segregation is required, a certified copy of the resolution shall be delivered to the treasurer of the county in which the real property is located who shall proceed to make the segregation ordered upon being tendered a fee of three dollars for each tract of land for which a segregation is to be made.

[ 2001 c 299 s 8; 1998 c 106 s 4; 1996 c 230 s 1607; 1963 c 4 s 36.29.160. Prior: 1959 c 142 s 2; 1953 c 210 s 1.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Effective date—1996 c 230: See notes following RCW 57.02.001.